New York, session 2025-2026, S869.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 6 of section 4 of chapter 576 of the laws of 1974 2 constituting the emergency tenant protection act of nineteen seventy- 3 four is amended by adding a new subdivision h to read as follows: 4 h. Notwithstanding any provision of law or rule or regulation to the 5 contrary, any adjustment in the legal regulated rent based upon a major 6 capital improvement shall be effective upon approval of the application 7 therefor. No increase may be collected for the period of time prior to 8 the date of approval of the application. 9 § 2. Section 26-512 of the administrative code of the city of New York 10 is amended by adding a new subdivision h to read as follows: 11 h. Notwithstanding any provision of law or rule or regulation to the 12 contrary, any adjustment in the legal regulated rent based upon a major 13 capital improvement shall be effective upon approval of the application 14 therefor. No increase may be collected for the period of time prior to 15 the date of approval of the application. 16 § 3. Subparagraph 10 of the second undesignated paragraph of paragraph 17 (a) of subdivision 4 of section 4 of chapter 274 of the laws of 1946, 18 constituting the emergency housing rent control law, as amended by EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02107-01-5 S. 869 2 1 section 25 of part B of chapter 97 of the laws of 2011, is amended and a 2 new subparagraph 11 is added to read as follows: 3 (10) the presence of unique or peculiar circumstances materially 4 affecting the maximum rent has resulted in a maximum rent which is 5 substantially lower than the rents generally prevailing in the same area 6 for substantially similar housing accommodations[.]; or (11) notwith- 7 standing any provision of law or rule or regulation to the contrary, any 8 adjustment in the legal regulated rent based upon a major capital 9 improvement shall be effective upon approval of the application there- 10 for. No increase may be collected for the period of time prior to the 11 date of approval of the application. 12 § 4. Paragraph 1 of subdivision g of section 26-405 of the administra- 13 tive code of the city of New York is amended by adding a new subpara- 14 graph (p) to read as follows: 15 (p) Notwithstanding any provision of law or rule or regulation to the 16 contrary, any adjustment in the legal regulated rent based upon a major 17 capital improvement shall be effective upon approval of the application 18 therefor. No increase may be collected for the period of time prior to 19 the date of approval of the application. 20 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately; provided that: 21 a. the amendments to section 26-512 of chapter 4 of title 26 of the 22 administrative code of the city of New York made by section two of this 23 act shall expire on the same date as such law expires and shall not 24 affect the expiration of such law as provided under section 26-520 of 25 such law; and 26 b. the amendments to section 26-405 of the city rent and rehabili- 27 tation law made by section four of this act shall remain in full force 28 and effect only as long as the public emergency requiring the regulation 29 and control of residential rents and evictions continues, as provided in 30 subdivision 3 of section 1 of the local emergency housing rent control 31 act.